Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.120

Additional fee assessments.

(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010 and 9A.88.030, an adult offender who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, or comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.

(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.090, an adult offender who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.090 or comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fee in the amount of:

(i) One thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has no prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;

(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has one prior conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and

(iii) Five thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.

(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a fee in the amount of:

(i) One thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has no prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;

(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars if the defendant has one prior conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and

(iii) Five thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.

(d) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fee in the amount of:

(i) Three thousand dollars if the defendant has no prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense;

(ii) Six thousand dollars if the defendant has one prior conviction, deferred sentence, deferred prosecution, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for this offense; and

(iii) Ten thousand dollars if the defendant has two or more prior convictions, deferred sentences, deferred prosecutions, or statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreements for this offense.

(2) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or part of the assessed fee in this section unless it finds, on the record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the maximum allowable fee.

(a) A superior court may, as described in RCW 9.94A.760, set a sum that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the fee imposed in this section.

(b) A district or municipal court may enter into a payment plan with the defendant, in which the fee assessed in this section is paid through scheduled periodic payments. The court may assess the defendant a reasonable fee for administrative services related to the operation of the payment plan.

(3) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to, increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.

(a) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services for victims, such as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills, training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in centers, and employment counseling.

(b) Two percent of the revenue from fees imposed under this section shall be remitted quarterly to the department of commerce, together with a report detailing the fees assessed, the revenue received, and how that revenue was spent.

(c) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or 35.20.220.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a court, county, or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.

(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with the conditions of probation.

[ 2015 c 265 s 20; 2013 c 121 s 5; 2012 c 134 s 3; 2007 c 368 s 12; 1995 c 353 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Intent—Finding—2013 c 121: See note following RCW 43.280.091.